North Dakota, session 69, SB2266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - 2023-25 BIENNIUM - OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT AND
BUDGET - STATE DISASTER RELIEF FUND - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated
out of any moneys in the state disaster relief fund in the state treasury, not otherwise
appropriated, the sum of $36,318, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the office of
management and budget for the purpose of providing a grant to the private investigation and
security board for costs incurred as the result of an unlawful protest of a pipeline, for the period
beginning with the effective date of this Act, and ending June 30, 2025. The funding
appropriated in this section is considered a one-time funding item.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.
Page No. 1 25.1232.01000